Utah statutes.
63G-6a-603.   Invitation for bids -- Contents -- Notice.

(1)  The bidding standard procurement process begins when the division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority issues an invitation for bids.

(2)  An invitation for bids shall:

(a)  state the period of time during which bids will be accepted;

(b)  describe the manner in which a bid shall be submitted;

(c)  state the place where a bid shall be submitted; and

(d)  include, or incorporate by reference:

(i)  a description of the procurement items sought;

(ii)  the objective criteria that will be used to evaluate the bids; and

(iii)  the required contractual terms and conditions.

(3)  An issuing procurement unit shall publish an invitation for bids in accordance with the requirements of Section 63G-6a-406.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

